California, session 20252026, AB1403.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The Legislature designed the Emergency Medical Services System and the Prehospital Emergency Medical Care Personnel Act (EMS Act), Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code, to encourage coordination and planning among the state, local governments, and private providers to achieve the most effective and cost-effective prehospital emergency medical services (EMS) on a countywide or regionwide basis.(2) The EMS Act defines the roles, responsibilities, and functions of the Emergency Medical Services Authority (Authority) and the local EMS agencies, and some, but not all, of the roles, responsibilities, and functions of the counties and boards of supervisors regarding prehospital EMS and ambulance services.(3) Other statutory authorities of a county and the board of supervisors regarding the provision and regulation of ambulance services, whether by public or private agreement, permit, license, or other means, and the provision of ambulance services for indigent county residents are located in statutes outside of the EMS Act, including, but not limited to, Sections 25369.5, 26612, 29606, and 54980 to 54983, inclusive, of the Government Code, Sections 1443 to 1445, inclusive, 1451 to 1455, inclusive, and 1473 to 1475, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code, Section 2512 of the Vehicle Code, and Sections 14136 and 16817 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(4) As a result of how and where these various statutory authorities are codified, significant confusion and uncertainty in the state exists regarding the statutory authorities, roles, responsibilities, rights, obligations, and functions of counties, boards of supervisors, and local EMS agencies regarding prehospital EMS and ambulance services and the interplay of statutes addressing these services within and outside of the EMS Act.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this act to do both of the following:(1) Clarify the statutory authorities, roles, responsibilities, rights, and functions of counties, boards of supervisors, and local EMS agencies regarding EMS and ambulance services.(2) Reaffirm the authority of a county board of supervisors or a governing body of an entity or a joint powers agency designated as the local EMS agency by the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 1797.200 of the Health and Safety Code to decide, as a policy matter, whether prehospital EMS and ambulance services shall be provided to persons located within the county’s jurisdiction through a county department or agency or by contracting with other local agencies or private providers.SEC. 2. Section 1797.234 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1797.234. (a) The county board of supervisors or the governing body of an entity or a joint powers agency designated as the local EMS agency by the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 1797.200 may exercise their statutory authority, including their statutory authority regarding prehospital EMS and ambulance services, to perform their functions under this division and to support the local EMS agency’s functions under this division.(b) The county board of supervisors or the governing body of an entity or a joint powers agency designated as the local EMS agency by the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 1797.200 may provide ambulance services to persons located within the county’s jurisdiction under this division by any of the following means or combination of means:(1) Creating a separate county department to provide ambulance services, providing the department with the necessary staffing, vehicles, and equipment, and operating that department as it staffs and operates other county departments.(2) Assigning the duty of providing ambulance services to residents of the county to an existing county department and providing the department with the necessary staffing, vehicles, and equipment to provide ambulance services.(3) Contracting with cities or local public agencies located within the county to provide ambulance services within areas under the jurisdiction of the county, the cities, or the local public agencies.(4) Contracting with private ambulance companies as provided for by statute, including under this division.(c) Contracts or assignments made under paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (b) that restrict operations to a county department or agency or other local agency do not constitute exclusive operating areas as defined by Section 1797.85 and do not require the local EMS agency to utilize a competitive process pursuant to Section 1797.224.(d) (1) A contract for emergency ambulance services entered into pursuant to this section shall not be entered into unless the board of supervisors or the governing body of an entity or joint powers agency designated as the local EMS agency by the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 1797.200 has adopted, by ordinance or resolution, a written policy setting forth requirements for the emergency ambulance services provider in the contract that include, but are not limited to, all of the following:(A) Employment retention policies.(B) Demonstrated experience of the provider serving similar populations and geographic areas.(C) Demonstrated diversity and equity efforts by the provider that address the unique needs of vulnerable and underserved populations of the service area.(D) Financial requirements, including requiring the provider to show proof of insurance and bonding.(E) A description of the provider’s public information and education activities and community involvement.(2) A contract entered into pursuant to this section shall include both of the following:(A) All ambulance service employees of the provider shall be paid comparable wages and benefits for services provided pursuant to the contract to those that are generally consistent with those provided to ambulance service employees in the same geographic region.(B) Staffing levels for ambulance service employees for services provided pursuant to the contract shall be comparable to staffing levels under any prior contract for those services in that jurisdiction.(e) Subcontracts for emergency ambulance services developed by a local agency that enters into a contract under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) shall comply with the requirements of subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 1797.231.(f) This section does not supersede Section 1797.201.(g) This section does not affect, modify, limit, or otherwise impair the authority’s enumerated powers and authorities under the Emergency Medical Services System and the Prehospital Emergency Medical Care Personnel Act.(h) This section does not affect, modify, limit, or otherwise impair the medical control of the medical director of a local EMS agency granted under the Emergency Medical Services System and the Prehospital Emergency Medical Care Personnel Act.(i) The Legislature finds and declares that the provisions of this section are declaratory of existing law.SECTION 1.Section 50470 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:50470.(a)(1)There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Building Homes and Jobs Trust Fund. All interest or other increments resulting from the investment of moneys in the fund shall be deposited in the fund, notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code.(2)Moneys in the Building Homes and Jobs Trust Fund shall not be subject to transfer to any other fund pursuant to any provision of Part 2 (commencing with Section 16300) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except to the Surplus Money Investment Fund.(b)Moneys in the Building Homes and Jobs Trust Fund shall be appropriated either through the annual Budget Act or as provided in this subdivision in accordance with the following:(1)Moneys collected on and after January 1, 2018, and until December 31, 2018, shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be allocated as follows:(A)Fifty percent of deposits into the fund shall be made available for local governments to update planning documents and zoning ordinances in order to streamline housing production, including, but not limited to, general plans, community plans, specific plans, sustainable communities strategies, and local coastal programs. Eligible uses also include new environmental analyses that eliminate the need for project-specific review and local process updates that improve and expedite local permitting.(i)Five percent of the funds specified by this subparagraph shall be available for technical assistance to jurisdictions updating specified planning documents. Technical assistance shall be provided by the department and the Governor’s Office of Planning and Research.(ii)The funds to be allocated pursuant to this subparagraph shall be held by the department until a local government submits a request for use. The request shall include a description of the proposed use of the funds in the interest of accelerating housing production. The proposed use of these funds shall be included in the local government’s funding plan and annual reports pursuant to subclauses (II) and (III) of clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2). Each recipient of funds under the program shall encumber the funds by December 31, 2020, and shall expend those funds no later than December 31, 2023. Any of these funds not allocated by the department within the first two years that those funds are available shall be made available by the department for the Multifamily Housing Program (Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 50675)).(B)Fifty percent of deposits into the fund shall be made available to the department to assist persons experiencing or at risk of homelessness, including, but not limited to, providing rapid rehousing, rental assistance, navigation centers, and the new construction, rehabilitation, and preservation of permanent and transitional rental housing.(C)The department shall ensure geographic equity in the distribution and expenditure of funds allocated pursuant to this paragraph.(2)Moneys collected on and after January 1, 2019, shall be allocated as follows:(A)Twenty percent of all moneys in the fund shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be expended for affordable owner-occupied workforce housing.(B)(i)Seventy percent of moneys deposited in the fund shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be made available to local governments as follows:(I)Ninety percent of the moneys specified in this subparagraph shall be allocated based on the formula specified in Section 5306 of Title 42 of the United States Code, in accordance with the distribution of funds pursuant to that formula for the federal Fiscal Year 2017, except that the portion allocated to nonentitlement areas pursuant to that section shall be distributed through a competitive grant program, administered by the department, as follows:(ia)The department shall award priority points to a county that has a population of 200,000 or less within the unincorporated areas of the county, to a local government that did not receive an award based on the formula specified in Section 5306 of Title 42 of the United States Code in 2016, and to a local government that pledges to use the money awarded pursuant to a competitive grant under this subclause to assist persons experiencing or at risk of homelessness, including, but not limited to, providing rapid rehousing, rental assistance, navigation centers, and the new construction, rehabilitation, and preservation of permanent and transitional rental housing.(ib)Moneys awarded to a local government pursuant to the competitive grant program shall be used for the purposes specified in subparagraph (D).(II)The remaining 10 percent of the moneys specified in this subparagraph shall be allocated equitably among local jurisdictions that are nonentitlement areas pursuant to the formula specified in Section 5306 of Title 42 of the United States Code for federal Fiscal Year 2017.(ii)To receive moneys pursuant to this subparagraph, local governments shall document minimum standards including the following:(I)Submit a plan to the department detailing the manner in which allocated funds will be used by the local government in a manner consistent with this paragraph and to meet the local government’s unmet share of the regional housing needs allocation.(II)Have a compliant housing element with the state and submit a current annual report pursuant to Section 65400 of the Government Code.(III)Submit an annual report to the department that provides ongoing tracking of the uses and expenditures of any allocated funds.(IV)Funds may be expended for the uses listed in subparagraph (D). Two or more local governments that receive an allocation pursuant to this subparagraph may expend those moneys on a joint project that is an authorized use under subparagraph (D).(V)Prioritize investments that increase the supply of housing to households that are at or below 60 percent of area median income, adjusted for household size.(VI)If a local government does not have a documented plan to expend the moneys allocated to it pursuant to this subparagraph within five years of that allocation, those moneys shall be exempt from the allocation requirements in this paragraph and shall revert to, and be paid and deposited in, the Housing Rehabilitation Loan Fund established pursuant to Section 50661 to be used for the Multifamily Housing Program (Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 50675)) or for technical assistance for local governments.(VII)A local government may petition the department to return any moneys allocated to it pursuant to this subparagraph. Any moneys returned pursuant to this clause shall be used for the Multifamily Housing Program (Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 50675)).(C)Thirty percent of moneys deposited in the fund shall be made available to the department for use as follows:(i)Five percent of the moneys deposited in the fund shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be used for state incentive programs, including loans and grants administered by the department. If the department receives insufficient funding applications for incentive programs financed pursuant to this clause, the department shall make those funds available for the Multifamily Housing Program (Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 50675)).(ii)(I)Subject to subclause (II), 10 percent of the moneys deposited in the fund shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be used to address affordable homeownership and rental housing opportunities for agricultural workers and their families.(II)On and after January 1, 2020, housing funded pursuant to this clause shall not be rented, sold, or subleased to an agricultural employer, as defined in Section 1140.4 of the Labor Code, or its agent, or a farm labor contractor, as defined in Section 1682 of the Labor Code, or its agent, who employs at least one H-2A worker, as defined in Section 50205, until the expiration of the regulatory agreement or affordability covenant, as applicable. A person or entity who receives funds made available pursuant to this clause on or after January 1, 2020, and expends any of those funds for the purpose of funding predevelopment of, developing, or operating any housing that is rented, sold, or subleased to an agricultural employer, as defined in Section 1140.4 of the Labor Code, or its agent, or a farm labor contractor, as defined in Section 1682 of the Labor Code, or its agent, and who employs at least one H-2A worker, as defined in Section 50205, until the expiration of the regulatory agreement or affordability covenant, as applicable, shall reimburse the department or other state agency that provided those funds, as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 50205. This subclause shall not apply to any contract entered into or any financial assistance provided pursuant to this clause prior to January 1, 2020.(III)A person or entity who receives funds made available pursuant to this section on and after January 1, 2020, and expends any of those funds for the purpose of funding predevelopment of, developing, or operating any housing shall submit a declaration to the department declaring the following:(ia)(Ia)The person or entity is not an agricultural employer, as defined in Section 1140.4 of the Labor Code, or its agent, or a farm labor contractor, as defined in Section 1682 of the Labor Code, or its agent, who employs at least one H-2A worker, as defined in Section 50205.(Ib)The person or entity will not rent, sell, or sublease any housing funded pursuant to this chapter to an agricultural employer, as defined in Section 1140.4 of the Labor Code, or its agent, or a farm labor contractor, as defined in Section 1682 of the Labor Code, or its agent, who employs at least one H-2A worker, as defined in Section 50205, until the expiration of the regulatory agreement or affordability covenant, as applicable.(ib)The declaration described in sub-subclause (ia) can be met through the inclusion in a regulatory agreement or affordability covenant, as applicable, with the department that is signed by the person or entity receiving funds pursuant to this chapter.(iii)Fifteen percent of the moneys deposited in the fund shall, notwithstanding any other provision of this section or Section 13340 of the Government Code, be transferred to the California Housing Finance Fund and continuously appropriated to the California Housing Finance Agency for the purpose of creating mixed income multifamily residential housing for lower to moderate-income households pursuant to Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 51325) of Part 3.(D)The moneys in the fund allocated to local governments may be expended for the following purposes:(i)The predevelopment, development, acquisition, rehabilitation, and preservation of multifamily, residential live-work, rental housing that is affordable to extremely low, very low, low-, and moderate-income households, including necessary operating subsidies.(ii)Affordable rental and ownership housing that meets the needs of a growing workforce earning up to 120 percent of area median income, or 150 percent of area median income in high-cost areas.(iii)Matching portions of funds placed into local or regional housing trust funds.(iv)Matching portions of funds available through the Low and Moderate Income Housing Asset Fund pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 34176 of the Health and Safety Code.(v)Capitalized reserves for services connected to the creation of new permanent supportive housing, including, but not limited to, developments funded through the Veterans Housing and Homelessness Prevention Bond Act of 2014.(vi)Assisting persons who are experiencing or at risk of homelessness, including providing rapid rehousing, rental assistance, navigation centers, emergency shelters, and the new construction, rehabilitation, and preservation of permanent and transitional housing.(vii)Accessibility modifications.(viii)Efforts to acquire and rehabilitate foreclosed or vacant homes.(ix)Homeownership opportunities, including, but not limited to, downpayment assistance.(x)Fiscal incentives or matching funds to local agencies that approve new housing for extremely low, very low, low-, and moderate-income households.(3)A state or local entity that receives an appropriation or allocation pursuant to this chapter shall use no more than 5 percent of that appropriation or allocation for costs related to the administration of the housing program for which the appropriation or allocation was made.(c)Both of the following shall be paid and deposited in the fund:(1)Any moneys appropriated and made available by the Legislature for purposes of the fund.(2)Any other moneys that may be made available to the department for the purposes of the fund from any other source or sources.(d)In consultation with stakeholders, the department may adopt guidelines to implement this section, including to determine allocation methodologies. Any guideline, rule, policy, or standard of general application employed by the department in implementing this chapter shall not be subject to the requirements of the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).